Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.110

Limitation on reinstatement after revocation—Reinstatement prohibited for certain felony crimes.

In case any certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW is revoked, the holder shall not be eligible to receive another certificate or permit for a period of twelve months after the date of revocation. However, if the certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW was revoked because of a guilty plea or the conviction of a felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, the certificate or permit shall not be reinstated.

[ 2009 c 396 s 6; 1990 c 33 s 410; 1989 c 320 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.70.180. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 346 s 2; RRS s 4993. Formerly RCW 28A.70.180, 28.70.180.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 320: See note following RCW 28A.410.090.